Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,172
Board; officers; meetings.

The board shall annually elect a chairperson from among the citizen members. The board shall meet at least quarterly and may meet more often at the call of the chairperson or the request of any three members.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 49.